Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1228
Board; report of yearly activities; publication and distribution required.

The board of an educational service unit shall cause to be published by November 1 of each year a brief report of the yearly activities of the board. The report shall include the amount of revenue received and expenditures itemized by categories. This publication shall be for one time in a newspaper of general circulation distributed in each county in the educational service unit. A copy of the report shall be distributed to each member school district by November 1 of each year.

Laws 1969, c. 700, § 3, p. 2699;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2210.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 945.